en: Sweet and sour chicken
fr: Poulet aigre doux

en: Sweet and sour chicken without side dishes
fr: Poulet aigre doux sans accompagnements

en: Sweet and sour chicken with side dishes
fr: Poulets aigre doux avec accompagnements

en: Chicken tajine
fr: Tajines de poulet, Tajine de poulet
hr: Pileći tagine
nl: Kiptajine
pl: Tadżin z kurczakiem, Tażin z kurczakiem, Tajine z kurczakiem
ro: Tajine de pui

en: Chicken tajine without side dishes
fr: Tajines de poulet sans accompagnements

en: Chicken tajine with side dishes
fr: Tajines de poulet avec accompagnements

en: Chicken curry
de: Hühnchencurry
es: Curry de pollo
fi: kanacurry
fr: Poulets au curry
hr: Piletina curry
it: Curry al pollo, Pollo al curry
ja: チキンカレー
lt: Vištienos karis
nl: Kipcurry
pl: Curry z kurczakiem
zh: 鸡咖喱

en: Chicken with curry and coconut milk sauce
fr: Poulet au curry et au lait de coco

en: Chicken curry without side dishes
fr: Poulets au curry sans accompagnements

en: Chicken curry with side dishes
fr: Poulets au curry avec accompagnements

en: Basque-style chicken, Chicken Basque style
fr: Poulets basquaise, Poulet basquaise, Poulets basquaises

en: Basque-style chicken with side dishes
fr: Poulets basquaise avec accompagnements

en: Basque-style chicken without side dishes
fr: Poulets basquaise sans accompagnements

en: Chicken tikka
ar: دجاج تكة
bn: চিকেন টিক্কা
da: Murgh tikka
de: Hähnchen Tikka
es: Pollo tikka
fr: Poulet tikka
hi: चिकन टिक्का
hr: Pileća tikka
id: Ayam tikka
it: Pollo tikka
ja: チキンティッカ
jv: Pitik tikka
kn: ಚಿಕನ್ ಟಿಕ್ಕಾ
ko: 무르그 티카
ml: ചിക്കൻ ടിക്ക
no: Murgh tikka
or: ଚିକେନ ଟିକ୍କା
pt: Frango tikka
ru: Чикен Тикка
ur: مرغ ٹکہ
vi: Gà Tikka
zh: 印度燒雞塊

en: Chicken tikka masala
de: Hähnchen Tikka Masala
es: Pollo tikka masala
fr: Poulet tikka masala
hr: Pileća tikka masala
it: Pollo tikka masala
ja: チキンティッカマサラ
nl: Kip tikka masala
zh: 鸡肉提卡马沙拉

en: Chicken tikka masala without side dishes
fr: Poulets tikka masala sans accompagnements

en: Chicken tikka masala with side dishes
fr: Poulets tikka masala avec accompagnements

en: Tandoori chicken
de: Tandoori-Huhn
es: Pollo tandoori
fr: Poulet tandoori
hr: Tandoori piletina
it: Pollo tandoori
ja: タンドリーチキン
nl: Tandoori kip
zh: 坦多里鸡

en: Butter chicken
xx: Butter chicken

en: Goat dishes, Goat meals
fr: Plats à la viande caprine, plats à base de viande caprine
he: מנות עזים
hr: Jela od kozjeg mesa
lt: Ožkų mėsos patiekalai
nl: Geitenvleesmaaltijden